src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERBS !!= @CODE@
kʼudlán% sg̲ál:kʼudlán% sg̲á CLASS-AL "for S to hide O by painting over it" ;
sg̲ál:sg̲á CLASS-AL "for S to hide O, keep O secret" ;
